Massachusetts, session 194th, H2123.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 36 of chapter 152 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the words “or hands”, in line 82, and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- ,distally to the elbows, or distally to the knees.
of 1